Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-852
Authority; journal; public records.

All
final actions of the authority shall be recorded in a journal, and the journal
and all instruments and documents relating thereto shall be kept on file at
the office of the authority and shall be open to the inspection of the public
at all reasonable times.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 49;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2949;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 49;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1749;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 52.